output.aff
SFX X Y 158
SFX X   liat        lajem      kliat
SFX X   liat        lajes      kliat
SFX X   liat        laje       kliat
SFX X   liat        lajeme     kliat
SFX X   liat        lajete     kliat
SFX X   liat        laju       kliat
SFX X   liat        laj        kliat
SFX X   liat        lajme      kliat
SFX X   liat        lajte      kliat
SFX X   liat        lajuc      kliat
SFX X   iat         ejem       [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ejes       [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         eje        [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ejeme      [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ejete      [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         eju        [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ej         [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ejme       [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ejte       [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ejuc       [^k]liat
SFX X   iat         ajem       riat
SFX X   iat         ajes       riat
SFX X   iat         aje        riat
SFX X   iat         ajeme      riat
SFX X   iat         ajete      riat
SFX X   iat         aju        riat
SFX X   iat         aj         riat
SFX X   iat         ajme       riat
SFX X   iat         ajte       riat
SFX X   iat         ajuc       riat
SFX X   iat         ejem       [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         ejes       [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         eje        [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         ejeme      [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         ejete      [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         eju        [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         ej         [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         ejme       [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         ejte       [dsvm]iat
SFX X   iat         ejuc       [dsvm]iat
SFX X   ziat        ezmem      ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmes      ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezme       ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmeme     ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmete     ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmu       ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmi       ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmime     ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmite     ziat
SFX X   ziat        ezmuc      ziat
SFX X   iat         al         ziat
SFX X   iat         ala        ziat
SFX X   iat         alo        ziat
SFX X   iat         ali        ziat
SFX X   at          al         [^z]iat
SFX X   at          ala        [^z]iat
SFX X   at          alo        [^z]iat
SFX X   at          ali        [^z]iat
SFX X   at          am         [^i]at
SFX X   at          as         [^i]at
SFX X   at          a          [^i]at
SFX X   at          ame        [^i]at
SFX X   at          ate        [^i]at
SFX X   at          aju        [^i]at
SFX X   at          aj         [^i]at
SFX X   at          ajme       [^i]at
SFX X   at          ajte       [^i]at
SFX X   at          ajuc       [^i]at
SFX X   at          al         [^i]at
SFX X   at          ala        [^i]at
SFX X   at          alo        [^i]at
SFX X   at          ali        [^i]at
SFX X   iet         em         ciet
SFX X   iet         es         ciet
SFX X   iet         e          ciet
SFX X   iet         eme        ciet
SFX X   iet         ete        ciet
SFX X   ciet        tiac       ciet
SFX X   iet         i          [clr]iet
SFX X   iet         ime        [clr]iet
SFX X   iet         ite        [clr]iet
SFX X   iet         u          [cr]iet
SFX X   iet         iac        riet
SFX X   iet         eju        [^clr]iet
SFX X   iet         ej         [^clr]iet
SFX X   iet         ejme       [^clr]iet
SFX X   iet         ejte       [^clr]iet
SFX X   iet         ejuc       [^clr]iet
SFX X   t           m          iet
SFX X   t           s          iet
SFX X   et          e          iet
SFX X   t           me         iet
SFX X   t           te         iet
SFX X   iet         el         iet
SFX X   iet         ela        iet
SFX X   iet         elo        iet
SFX X   iet         eli        iet
SFX X   bit         b          bit
SFX X   cit         c          cit
SFX X   cit         c          cit
SFX X   dit         d          dit
SFX X   dit         dme        dit
SFX X   dit         dte        dit
SFX X   fit         f          fit
SFX X   git         g          git
SFX X   chit        ch         chit
SFX X   it          a          jit
SFX X   it          ac         jit
SFX X   jit         j          jit
SFX X   it          ia         [^j]it
SFX X   it          iac        [^j]it
SFX X   kit         k          kit
SFX X   lit         l          [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX X   lit         lme        [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX X   lit         lte        [aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX X   it          i          [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX X   it          ime        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX X   it          ite        [^aaaeeiioouuyy]lit
SFX X   mit         m          mit
SFX X   nit         n          nit
SFX X   nit         nme        nit
SFX X   nit         nte        nit
SFX X   pit         p          pit
SFX X   rit         r          rit
SFX X   vit         v          vit
SFX X   sit         s          sit
SFX X   sit         s          sit
SFX X   tit         t          tit
SFX X   tit         tme        tit
SFX X   tit         tte        tit
SFX X   zit         z          zit
SFX X   zit         z          zit
SFX X   it          me         [^dlnt]it
SFX X   it          te         [^dlnt]it
SFX X   it          im         it
SFX X   it          is         it
SFX X   it          i          it
SFX X   it          ime        it
SFX X   it          ite        it
SFX X   it          ia         it
SFX X   t           l          it
SFX X   t           la         it
SFX X   t           lo         it
SFX X   t           li         it
SFX X   t           jem        yt
SFX X   t           jes        yt
SFX X   t           je         yt
SFX X   t           jeme       yt
SFX X   t           jete       yt
SFX X   t           ju         yt
SFX X   t           juc        yt
SFX X   yt          y          yt
SFX X   t           me         yt
SFX X   t           te         yt
SFX X   t           l          yt
SFX X   t           la         yt
SFX X   t           lo         yt
SFX X   t           li         yt
