output.dic
bdiet/NX
biedit/NX
blizit/NX
branit/NX
bruchatiet/NX
burat/NX
celiet/NX
cliviet/NX
calunit/NX
ciarkat/NX
cniet/NX
debatuvat/NX
dlazdit/NX
dobyvat/NX
dodavat/NX
dogniavit/NX
dohovarat/NX
dokopavat/NX
dokyvat/NX
domielat/NX
doobjednavat/NX
dopijat/NX
dopriat/NX
doriesit/NX
dosnivavat/NX
dosytit/NX
dotlacat/NX
dotvrdzat/NX
dovalat/NX
dovrsit/NX
dozierat/NX
drevnatiet/NX
duchat/NX
dusievat/NX
farat/NX
fukavat/NX
grobianit/NX
hihunat/NX
hlasit/NX
hniezdievat/NX
hoviet/NX
hrdzaviet/NX
hulakat/NX
hybavat/NX
chladiaci/NX
chovatel/NX
chrumat/NTX
chybat/NX
jarabiet/NX
kamaratit/NX
kasovatiet/NX
klatit/NX
klient/CNX
kolisat/NX
kopniet/NX
kracat/NX
krbalat/NX
krmievat/NX
kruzlat/NX
kuzlit/NX
kyvat/NX
lamat/NX
lienit/NX
listuvat/NX
lucit/NX
magat/NX
matat/ENX
miast/NX
mlatievat/NX
modriet/NX
murar/NX
nabiedit/NX
nacechravat/NX
nacriet/NX
naddvihat/NX
nadievat/NX
nadpracuvat/NX
nadsivat/NX
nagrobianit/NX
nahnivat/NX
nahryzat/NX
nakazat/NX
nakukat/NX
nalicit/NX
namahat/NX
namosurit/NX
naockuvat/NX
napichavat/NX
napominat/NX
narabat/NX
narovnavat/NX
nasavat/NX
nastokavat/NX
nastruhat/NX
nasytit/NX
natierat/NX
natrieskat/NX
navazit/NX
navlhcovaci/NX
navrtavat/NX
nazhanat/NX
necnost/NX
nevojak/NX
nukat/NX
obavat/NX
obhadzat/NX
obhryzt/NX
objedavat/NX
oblamat/NX
obliekat/NX
obmyvat/NX
obostriet/NX
obrusit/NX
obstavat/NX
obsuchat/NX
obtriet/NX
ociedzat/NX
ocerveniet/NX
odbudat/NX
oddialit/NX
odhanat/NX
odchovavat/NX
odkaslavat/NX
odkornit/NX
odkyvat/NX
odlisit/NX
odmlciavat/NX
odolavat/NX
odostierat/NX
odparat/NX
odpocitavat/NX
odpratuvat/NX
odputavat/NX
odreaguvat/NX
odsavat/NX
odstranit/NX
odsypavat/NX
odsuchat/NX
odtrubit/NX
odvarat/NX
odvlacat/NX
odzvanat/NX
ohlasit/NX
ohradzat/NX
ohurit/NX
ochromiet/NX
okmasat/NX
okrievat/NX
okunat/NX
omacat/NX
omeskavat/NX
omyt/NX
onezdraviet/NX
opanovavat/NX
opierat/NX
oplesniviet/NX
opominat/NX
oprchavat/NX
orezavat/NX
osiat/NX
osladzat/NX
ostarievat/NX
osviezit/NX
oskrabkavat/NX
ospatniet/NX
otaziet/NX
otmaviet/NX
otukavat/NX
ovievat/NX
ozdraviet/NX
ozierat/NX
papa/NX
pestuvat/NX
pipat/NX
plavat/NX
plieskat/NX
pobelievat/NX
poburit/NX
podbiehat/NX
podhynat/NX
podkopavat/NX
podliepat/NX
podmyvat/NX
podoplnat/NX
podpilit/NX
podriemat/NX
podsiat/NX
podsivat/NX
podupkavat/NX
pofrkat/NX
pohasinat/NX
pohoviet/NX
pochabiet/NX
pojimat/NX
pokmasat/NX
pokupit/NX
polatat/NX
pomacat/NX
pomiesit/NX
pomracat/NX
pomutit/NX
ponahanat/NX
ponapinat/NX
ponukat/NX
poondiat/NX
popierat/NX
popocuvat/NX
poprehanat/NX
popresadzat/NX
poprevazat/NX
popribiehat/NX
popripinat/NX
porabat/NX
porozhanat/NX
poroznasat/NX
porozsadzat/NX
porozvesiavat/NX
posedkavat/NX
poskytovat/NWX
pospinat/NX
postavat/NX
postlkat/NX
postriasat/NX
postupit/NX
posypavat/NX
poskriabat/NX
postipkavat/NX
posuskavat/NX
potierat/NX
potrhat/NX
potyrat/NX
poumierat/NX
poutierat/NX
povievat/NX
povravat/NX
povybehavat/NX
povyhryzat/NX
povyliezat/NX
povypaduvat/NX
povyrazat/NX
povyskrabavat/NX
povyzliekat/NX
pozahasat/NX
pozaliepat/NX
pozapinat/NX
pozatinat/NX
pozbijat/NX
pozhovarat/NX
poznasat/NX
pozosivat/NX
pozehnavat/NX
prasia/NX
prebarat/NX
prebodavat/NX
prebudzat/NX
precerpavat/NX
predbehavat/NX
predchladzat/NX
prednasat/NX
predstierat/NX
predvolavat/NX
prehajdakat/NX
prehltavat/NX
prehravat/NX
prehyrit/NX
prekarat/NX
preklzavat/NX
prekrutit/NX
preletuvat/NX
prelinat/NX
premavat/NX
premiesat/NX
premyslat/NX
preobjednavat/X
preoravat/NX
prepajat/NX
prepinat/NX
preplnat/NX
preratat/NX
prerubavat/NX
preschynat/NX
preslychat/NX
prestriekavat/NX
presusat/NX
presivat/NX
pretierat/NX
pretrhat/NX
preukazat/NX
previazat/NX
prevravat/NX
prezliekat/NX
prezierat/NX
pribasnit/NX
priclanat/NX
pridusat/NX
prihladzat/NX
prihrievat/NX
prikotulat/NX
prikryvat/NX
prilietat/NX
primiesit/NX
prinavratit/NX
pripalit/NX
priplavat/NX
pripustat/NX
prirezavat/NX
prislubit/NX
prisudit/NX
pritlacat/NX
privadzat/NX
privinat/NX
prizriet/NX
prystit/NX
racit/NX
remeselnicit/NX
rohovatiet/NX
rozbijat/NX
rozburacat/NX
rozculit/NX
rozdruzgat/NX
rozgniavit/NX
rozhliadat/NX
rozhybavat/NX
rozkamaratit/NX
rozkurit/NX
rozliehat/NX
rozlustit/NX
rozmetuvat/NX
rozmotavat/NX
rozodriet/NX
rozoravat/NX
rozostielat/NX
rozovriet/NX
rozpalit/NX
rozplyvat/NX
rozpracuvat/NX
rozprplavat/NX
rozputat/NX
rozriedit/NX
rozsekavat/NX
rozstriekat/NX
rozsypat/NX
roztarat/NX
roztracat/NX
roztrusit/NX
rozvazat/NX
rozvinat/NX
rozvravat/NX
rozziarit/NX
rutit/NX
scukornatiet/NX
scitavat/NX
sfukat/NX
schulit/NX
sidlit/NX
skapinat/NX
sklucit/NX
skraslit/NX
skrutit/NX
skusat/NX
slovickarit/NX
smrdievat/NX
sobasit/NX
spanikarit/NX
spijat/NX
splietat/NX
spochabiet/NX
spopolaviet/NX
spracuvat/NX
spriadat/NX
sprobuvat/NX
sputnavat/NX
stemniet/NX
stisit/NX
stolarcit/NX
strasievat/NX
striasat/NX
strkavat/NX
stucniet/NX
sudievat/NX
svarit/NX
sypavat/NX
septavat/NX
skriekat/NX
skvrkat/NX
somravat/NX
stikavat/NX
sustat/NX
tesievat/NX
tliet/NX
trblietat/NTX
triet/NX
truchlit/NX
tupievat/NX
tyrat/NTX
ucitit/NX
udievat/NX
ugniavit/NX
uhukat/NX
uchylit/NX
ukrutit/NX
ulupit/NX
umriet/NX
upchavat/NX
uprazdnit/NX
urovnavat/NX
usporaduvat/NX
usukat/NX
utinat/NX
utracat/NX
ututlavat/NX
uzatvarat/NX
uzit/NX
vazievat/NX
vhanat/NX
vitavat/NX
vletuvat/NX
vnasat/NX
vpalit/NX
vrazat/NX
vrubit/NX
vsavat/NX
vsimat/NX
vybajit/NX
vybozkavat/NX
vyciedzat/NX
vycaruvat/NX
vycnievat/NX
vydobavat/NX
vydychat/NX
vyhladavat/NX
vyhrabuvat/NX
vyhybat/NX
vychylit/NX
vykluvat/NX
vykupit/NX
vylietat/NX
vymeskavat/NX
vynahradzat/NX
vypadavat/NX
vyplakat/NX
vypoziciavat/NX
vypulit/NX
vyrutit/NX
vyskat/NX
vystierat/NX
vysuvat/NX
vytesavat/NX
vytriestat/NX
vyvabit/NX
vyzbierat/NX
vyzyvat/NX
vzduvat/NX
vztycit/NX
zabranit/NX
zacerniet/NX
zadupavat/NX
zahlasit/NX
zahrdzaviet/NX
zachciet/NX
zaklanat/NX
zakrkat/NX
zakvilit/NX
zamavat/NX
zamotavat/NX
zanotit/NX
zapachat/NX
zaplnat/NX
zaprisahavat/NX
zarovnavat/NX
zasluzit/NX
zastrajat/NX
zaskriekat/NX
zatrhavat/NX
zavanat/NX
zavrsit/NX
zaziadat/NX
zbojnicit/NX
zdrahat/NX
zhanat/NX
zhrnat/NX
zjemniet/NX
zliezat/NX
zmarnit/NX
zmocniet/NX
zmyslat/NX
zneuzivat/NX
zomdliet/NX
zosobasit/NX
zoskrtavat/NX
zovriet/NX
zrealnit/NX
zryt/NX
zvazniet/NX
zvlaknit/NX
zvrucnievat/NX
zmurit/NX
